Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-12,183
Agreement; requirements; documentation of private funds.

(1) Within ninety days after approval of the application, the director shall prepare and deliver a written agreement to the applicant for the applicant's signature. The applicant and the director, on behalf of the State of Nebraska, shall enter into such written agreement. Under the agreement, the applicant shall agree to undertake the project and report all investment for the project to the director annually. The director, on behalf of the State of Nebraska, shall agree to allow the applicant to receive the matching funds allowed in the Nebraska Transformational Projects Act, subject to appropriation of such funds by the Legislature. The application, and all supporting documentation, to the extent approved, shall be considered a part of the agreement. The agreement shall state:

(a) The qualified location;

(b) The type of documentation the applicant will need to document its investment and receipt of private dollars under the act;

(c) The date the application was complete;

(d) A requirement that the applicant be and will stay registered for the E-Verify Program provided by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services for the duration of the project;

(e) A requirement that, after the completion of the application, the applicant update the director, within sixty days after the occurrence of any of the following events:

(i) Execution of an agreement for construction of real property at the project;

(ii) Local approval for construction of real property at the project;

(iii) A binding commitment for financing of the project by a private lender, to the extent applicable;

(iv) Commencement of construction of real property at the project; and

(v) The issuance of a certificate of occupancy for real property at the project;

(f) A requirement that the applicant provide any information needed by the director to perform his or her responsibilities under the Nebraska Transformational Projects Act, in the manner specified by the director;

(g) A requirement that the applicant provide an annually updated timetable showing the private dollars donated and received and the investment for the project, in the manner specified by the director; and

(h) A requirement that the applicant update the director annually, with its timetable or in the manner specified by the director, on any changes in plans or circumstances which it reasonably expects will affect the investment for the project.

(2) The agreement shall state that any failure by the applicant to provide timely updates or information required by the director or the act may result in the loss of the right to receive matching funds or, at the discretion of the director, result in the deferral of matching fund disbursements until such updates and information have been provided to the director by the applicant.

(3) The agreement shall state that the applicant shall agree to provide documentation to the director validating the receipt of private dollars received throughout the continuation period but is not required to disclose the names of any donors of private dollars.

(4) An agreement under the Nebraska Transformational Projects Act shall have a duration of no more than fifteen years after the date of application, consisting of up to the ten years of the transformational period followed by the five-year continuation period, except that such agreement shall remain effective until all matching fund payments have been received as provided for under the act.

(5) An agreement under the Nebraska Transformational Projects Act must be approved by the governing body of the applicant to be valid.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 99;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 185.